West Virginia, session 2025, SB492.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 8. REGULATION AND CONTROL OF ELECTIONS. §3-8-4a. Termination of political committees. (a) A political committee may terminate by filing a written request, in accordance with the provisions of section four of this article, and by stating in the request that it will no longer receive any contributions or make any disbursements and that it has no outstanding debts or obligations. At such time, any excess funds of the committee may be transferred to a political committee established by the same candidate pursuant to the provisions of section four or five-e of this article.(b) The provisions of this section may not be construed to eliminate or limit the authority of the Secretary of State, in consultation with the state election commission, to establish procedures for: (1) The determination of insolvency with respect to any political committee; (2) the orderly liquidation of an insolvent political committee and the orderly application of its assets for the reduction of outstanding debts; and (3) the termination of an insolvent political committee after such liquidation and application of assets.(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, any political committee which has been terminated within three years prior to the effective date of the reenactment of this section during the regular session of the Legislature in the year 2002, pursuant to a written request made in accordance with the provisions of section four of this article, may file a written request and be authorized by the Secretary of State to reestablish the political committee. Any request to reestablish a political committee pursuant to the provisions of this subsection must be filed on or before July 1, 2002. The provisions of this subsection may not be construed to increase the maximum contribution authorized during an election cycle, as provided in section twelve of this article